Ohio, session 136, HB611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3796.01 and 3796.21 be amended and section 3796.25 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3796.01. (A) As used in this chapter: (1) "Marijuana" means marihuana as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Medical marijuana" means marijuana that is cultivated, processed, dispensed, tested, possessed, or used for a medical purpose in accordance with this chapter. "Medical marijuana" does not include adult-use marijuana or homegrown marijuana. (3) "Academic medical center" has the same meaning as in section 4731.297 of the Revised Code. (4) "Drug database" means the database established and maintained by the state board of pharmacy pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code. (5) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (6) "Qualifying medical condition" means any of the following: (a) Acquired immune deficiency syndrome; (b) Alzheimer's disease; (c) Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis; (d) Cancer; (e) Chronic traumatic encephalopathy; (f) Crohn's disease; (g) Epilepsy or another seizure disorder; (h) Fibromyalgia; (i) Glaucoma; (j) Hepatitis C; (k) Inflammatory bowel disease; (l) Multiple sclerosis; (m) Pain that is either of the following: (i) Chronic and severe; (ii) Intractable. (n) Parkinson's disease; (o) Positive status for HIV; (p) Post-traumatic stress disorder; (q) Sickle cell anemia; (r) Spinal cord disease or injury; (s) Tourette's syndrome; (t) Traumatic brain injury; (u) Ulcerative colitis; (v) Any other disease or condition added by the state medical board under section 4731.302 of the Revised Code. (7) "State university" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (8) "Adult-use consumer" means an individual who is at least twenty-one years of age. (9) "Adult-use marijuana" means marijuana that is cultivated, processed, dispensed, or tested for, or possessed or used by, an adult-use consumer, in accordance with this chapter. "Adult-use marijuana" includes marijuana cultivated, processed, dispensed, or tested for, or possessed or used by, an adult-use consumer before the effective date of this amendment March 20, 2026, in accordance with Chapter 3780. of the Revised Code, as that chapter existed immediately prior to the effective date of this amendmentMarch 20, 2026. "Adult-use marijuana" does not include medical marijuana or homegrown marijuana. (10) "Church" has the meaning defined in section 1710.01 of the Revised Code. (11) "Public library" means a library provided for under Chapter 3375. of the Revised Code. (12) "Public park" means a park established by the state or a political subdivision of the state, including a county, township, municipal corporation, or park district. (13) "Public playground" means a playground established by the state or a political subdivision of the state, including a county, township, municipal corporation, or park district. (14) "School" means a child care center as defined under section 5104.01 of the Revised Code, a preschool as defined under section 2950.034 of the Revised Code, or a public or nonpublic primary school or secondary school. (15) "Public place" has the same meaning as in section 3794.01 of the Revised Code. (16) "Ohio investigative unit" means the investigative unit maintained by the department of public safety under section 5502.13 of the Revised Code. (17) "Homegrown marijuana" means marijuana cultivated, grown, processed, or possessed by an adult-use consumer in accordance with section 3796.04 of the Revised Code. "Homegrown marijuana" includes marijuana cultivated, grown, processed, or possessed before the effective date of this amendment March 20, 2026, under former section 3780.28 of the Revised Code, as that section existed immediately prior to the effective date of this amendmentMarch 20, 2026. "Homegrown marijuana" does not include medical marijuana or adult-use marijuana. (18) "Provisional license" means a temporary license issued to an applicant for a cultivator, processor, retail dispensary, or laboratory license under this chapter or Chapter 3780. of the Revised Code, as that chapter existed immediately before the effective date of this amendmentMarch 20, 2026, that establishes the conditions that must be met before the provisional license holder may engage in the activities authorized by section 3796.18, 3796.19, 3796.20, or 3796.21 of the Revised Code. (19) "Certificate of operation" means a certificate issued to the holder of a provisional license that authorizes the recipient to engage in the activities authorized by section 3796.18, 3796.19, 3796.20, or 3796.21 of the Revised Code. (20) "Licensed cultivator" means the holder of a current, valid license issued pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 3780. of the Revised Code, as that chapter existed immediately before the effective date of this amendmentMarch 20, 2026, to engage in the activities authorized by section 3796.18 of the Revised Code. (21) "Licensed processor" means the holder of a current, valid license issued pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 3780. of the Revised Code, as that chapter existed immediately before the effective date of this amendmentMarch 20, 2026, to engage in the activities authorized by section 3796.19 of the Revised Code. (22) "Licensed dispensary" means the holder of a current, valid license issued pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 3780. of the Revised Code, as that chapter existed immediately before the effective date of this amendmentMarch 20, 2026, to engage in the activities authorized by section 3796.20 of the Revised Code. (23) "Licensed laboratory" means the holder of a current, valid license issued pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 3780. of the Revised Code, as that chapter existed immediately before the effective date of this amendmentMarch 20, 2026, to engage in the activities authorized by section 3796.21 of the Revised Code. (24) "License holder" means the holder of a current, valid license issued under this chapter or Chapter 3780. of the Revised Code, as that chapter existed immediately before the effective date of this amendment;March 20, 2026. (25) "Physical control" means being in the operator's position of a vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, watercraft, or aircraft and having possession of the vehicle's, streetcar's, trackless trolley's, watercraft's, or aircraft's ignition key or other ignition device. (26) "Licensed paired cultivator" means the holder of a current, valid license issued pursuant to section 3796.25 of the Revised Code to engage in activities authorized by that section. (B) As used in the Revised Code, the "division of marijuana control" means the division of cannabis control and the "superintendent of marijuana control" means the superintendent of cannabis control. Whenever the division of marijuana control or the superintendent of marijuana control is referred to or designated in any statute, rule, contract, grant, or other document, the reference or designation shall be deemed to refer to the division of cannabis control or the superintendent of cannabis control, as indicated by context. (C) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of Chapter 3719. of the Revised Code or the rules adopted under it, for purposes of this chapter, marijuana is a schedule II controlled substance. Sec. 3796.21. (A) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, a licensed laboratory, including the holder of a current, valid laboratory license issued under this chapter before the effective date of this amendmentMarch 20, 2026, shall do both of the following: (1) Obtain medical marijuana and adult-use marijuana from one or more licensed cultivators, licensed processors, and licensed dispensaries, and licensed paired cultivators; (2) Conduct testing in the manner specified in rules adopted under section 3796.03 of the Revised Code. (B) When testing medical marijuana or adult-use marijuana, a licensed laboratory shall do both of the following: (1) Test for potency, homogeneity, and contamination; (2) Prepare a report of the test results. Sec. 3796.25. (A) Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section, subject to division (B)(1) of section 3796.05 of the Revised Code, the division of cannabis control shall issue the following licenses to an applicant that meets all of the requirements described in division (B) of this section: (1) One dispensary license, at a location designated in the application for certificate of operation; (2) One paired cultivator license, at a location designated in the application for certificate of operation. (B) Subject to division (C) of this section, the division of cannabis control shall issue the licenses described in division (A) of this section to an applicant that meets all of the following: (1) The applicant is a licensed processor that was issued a processor license pursuant to this chapter on or before December 7, 2023. (2) The applicant has not and does not transfer the processor license or control of processing operations at any point after December 7, 2023, and before the date the respective license is issued under this section. (3) The applicant does not have any common ownership or control with a licensed cultivator. (C) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of the Revised Code, and except as otherwise provided in division (D) of this section, the holder of a current and valid paired cultivator license issued in accordance with this section may do any of the following: (1) Cultivate adult-use marijuana and medical marijuana; (2) Distribute, transfer, and sell adult-use marijuana and medical marijuana to other license holders; (3) Acquire seeds, clones, plants, and other genetic material. (D) A licensed paired cultivator shall not cultivate adult-use marijuana or medical marijuana for personal, family, or household use under the license. (E)(1) A licensed paired cultivator may operate a cultivation area specified by the division not to exceed five thousand square feet. (2) A licensed paired cultivator may request and receive one or more expansions to the licensed paired cultivator's cultivation area, subject to the approval of the division, so long as the resulting total cultivation area, including all expansions, does not exceed the applicable maximum cultivation area prescribed by division (E)(1) of this section. Section 2. That existing sections 3796.01 and 3796.21 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.